Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Chapter 7. Surface Mining and Reclamation of Land
§ 53-7-67.
Release of bond; contents of application; inspection and evaluation of reclamation work; schedule for release; procedure on disapproval of release.

Upon completion of the operation in the permit area, the operator may file an application with the Permit Board for the release of the performance bond or deposit. The application for performance bond release shall require a description of the results achieved in accordance with the operator’s reclamation plan, which includes revegetation and end result plans, and any other information the Permit Board may require in accordance with this chapter. The Permit Board shall file a copy of the performance bond release application for public inspection with the chancery clerk of the county where the majority of the surface mining operation is located and with the local soil and water conservation district. The Permit Board shall give notice of the pending bond release application by publication in the form as the commission by regulation may require after inspecting and evaluating the reclamation work as provided by subsection (2) of this section.

After receipt of the application for bond release, the department shall, and the local soil and water district commissioners may, within thirty (30) days, conduct an inspection and evaluation of the reclamation work involved. The evaluation shall consider, among other things, the occurrence of pollution of surface and subsurface water, the probability of continuance or future occurrence of pollution, and the estimated cost of abating the pollution. Results of the evaluation and findings of the department or the soil and water commissioners, or both, shall be provided within thirty (30) days after the inspection to the operator and other interested parties making written request for the evaluation and findings. The evaluation and findings of the soil and water commissioners, if any shall be forwarded to the department before the end of the thirty (30) days.

The Permit Board may release in whole or in part the performance bond or deposit if it is satisfied that reclamation covered by the performance bond or deposit or portion thereof has been accomplished as required by this chapter according to the following schedule:

When the operator or surety completes required backfilling, regrading, and drainage control of a bonded area in accordance with the approved reclamation plan, the Permit Board may release up to ninety percent (90%) of the performance bond or deposit for the applicable permit area. The amount of the unreleased portion of the performance bond or deposit shall not be less than the amount necessary to assure completion of the reclamation work by a third party in the event of default by the operator; and

When the operator has successfully completed the remaining reclamation activities, but not before two (2) years beyond the date of the initial performance bond release, the Permit Board may release the remaining portion of the performance bond or deposit. No performance bond or deposit shall be fully released until all reclamation requirements of this chapter are fully met.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, the Permit Board may release one hundred percent (100%) of the performance bond or deposit to private contractors surface mining on areas provided to them by the United States Army Corps of Engineers. The Permit Board may release the performance bond or deposit only if the contractors have completed the reclamation work required in paragraph (a) of this subsection and the Corps of Engineers furnishes written assurance to the Permit Board that it accepts responsibility for restoration of the mined areas in accordance with all applicable reclamation standards of this chapter.

If the Permit Board denies the application for release of the performance bond or deposit or portion thereof, it shall notify the operator, in writing, stating the reasons for denial and recommending corrective actions necessary to secure the release.

The Permit Board shall authorize the executive director under those conditions the Permit Board may prescribe to administratively release any performance bond or deposit provided by an operator for coverage under a general permit issued under Section 53-7-23. A decision of the executive director is a decision of the Permit Board and shall be subject to review and appeal as provided in Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 20; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 53; Laws, 1980, ch. 401; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-69.
Surface Mining and Reclamation Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the “Surface Mining and Reclamation Fund,” referred to hereinafter as the “fund.” There is created in the fund an account designated as the “Land Reclamation Account” and an account designated as the “Surface Mining Program Operations Account.”

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal therein shall be credited by the Treasurer to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private sources, including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, judicial actions, penalties and forfeited performance bonds. Any monies received from penalties, forfeited performance bonds, judicial actions and the interest thereon, less enforcement and collection costs, shall be credited to the Land Reclamation Account. Any monies received from the collection of fees, grants, taxes, public or private donations and the interest thereon shall be credited to the Surface Mining Program Operations Account.

The commission shall expend or utilize monies in the fund by an annual appropriation by the Legislature as provided herein. Monies in the Land Reclamation Account may be used to defray any costs of reclamation of land affected by mining operations. Monies in the Surface Mining Program Operations Account may be used to defray the reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Proceeds from the forfeiture of performance bonds or deposits and penalties recovered shall be available to be expended to reclaim, in accordance with this chapter, lands with respect to which the performance bonds or deposits were provided and penalties assessed. If the commission expends monies from the fund for which the cost of reclamation exceeded the proceeds from the forfeiture of performance bonds or deposits, the commission may seek to recover any monies expended from the fund from any responsible party.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 21(1, 2); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-71.
Reclamation work; utilizing services of governmental agencies and private contractors; competitive bidding; right of access.

In the reclamation of land affected by surface mining for which it has funds available, the commission may avail itself of any services which may be provided by other state agencies, political subdivisions or the federal government, and may compensate them for the services. The commission may cause the reclamation work to be done through contract with other governmental agencies or with qualified persons. The contracts shall be awarded as provided by state law and policies of the commission. Any person under contract to the commission may enter onto the land affected to carry out the reclamation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 21(3); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 22, eff from and after April 15, 1978.]

§ 53-7-75.
Disclosure of confidential information; penalty; application of Trade Secrets Act.

Information submitted to the department, commission, Permit Board or local soil and water conservation district pertaining to the deposits of materials, trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information relating to the competitive rights of the applicant and which is specifically identified as confidential, shall not be available for public examination and shall not be considered as a public record if:

The applicant submits a written confidentiality claim to the commission before submission of the information; and

The commission determines the confidentiality claim to be valid.

The confidentiality claim shall include a generic description of the nature of the information included in the submission. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with the Mississippi Public Records Act regarding access to confidential information. Any information for which a confidentiality claim is asserted shall not be disclosed pending the outcome of any formal hearing and all appeals.

Any person knowingly and willfully making unauthorized disclosures of any information determined to be confidential shall be liable for civil damages arising from the unauthorized disclosure and, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and dismissed from public office or employment.

This section shall be supplemental to remedies for misappropriation of a trade secret provided in the Mississippi Uniform Trade Secrets Act, Sections 75-26-1 through 75-26-19.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 23; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 54; Laws, 1990, ch. 442, § 13; Laws, 2002, ch. 492 , § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-77.
Surface Mine Worker Safety Training Program Operations Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Surface Mine Worker Safety Training Program Operations Fund, referred to in this section as “special fund,” to be administered by the executive director. The special fund shall consist of monies as may be appropriated by the Legislature and any other monies authorized under this section.

Monies in the special fund shall be utilized to pay reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with surface mine worker safety training provided by the department including, but not limited to, matching funds for federal grants to meet federal grant requirements to pay a proportional share of the total cost of the training.

Expenditures may be made from the special fund upon requisition by the executive director.

The special fund may receive monies from any available public or private source including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, judicial actions and appropriated funds.

Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

The commission shall set by order the fee for surface mine worker safety training, not to exceed the cost of providing the training.

All monies collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the special fund.

The commission may delegate to the department responsibility for the collection of fees under this subsection.

Any person required to pay a fee under this subsection who disagrees with the calculation or applicability of the fee may petition the commission for a hearing in accordance with Sections 49-17-33 and 49-17-35.

Fees collected under this subsection shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.